de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel > Schreibgeräte: Zeichenkohle; Kreide; Wachsmalstifte; Markierstifte & Textmarker; Multifunktions-Schreibgeräte; Pastellkreiden; Füller & Bleistifte
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти > Инструменти за писане и рисуване: Въглени за рисуване; Тебешир; Восъчни пастели; Маркери и текст маркери; Многофункционални инструменти за писане; Пастели; Химикалки и моливи
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina > Artículos de escritura y dibujo: Carboncillos; Tiza; Ceras; Rotuladores y marcadores; Útiles de escritura multifunción; Lápices pastel; Bolígrafos y lápices
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구 > 필기구/제도용구: 회화용 목탄; 분필; 크레용; 마커/형광펜; 다기능 필기구; 파스텔; 펜/연필
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje > Psací potřeby: Malířský uhel; Psací křída; Krajóny; Popisovače a zvýrazňovače; Multifunkční psací potřeby; Umělecké pastely; Pera a tužky
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden > Schrijfinstrumenten: Houtskool; Krijt; Kleurkrijtjes; Markeerstiften; Multifunctionele schrijfwaren; Pastelkrijtjes; Pennen en potloden
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности > Письменные принадлежности: Уголь для рисования; Мел; Цветные мелки; Маркеры и текстовыделители; Многофункциональные письменные принадлежности; Пастель; Ручки и карандаши
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品 > 筆記用具: 画用木炭; チョーク; クレヨン; マーカーペン・蛍光ペン; 多機能ペン; パステル; 鉛筆・ペン
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório > Instrumentos de escrita: Carvões artísticos; Giz; Giz de cera; Marcadores e marca-textos; Instrumentos de escrita multifuncionais; Pastéis; Canetas e lápis
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου > Όργανα γραφής & σχεδίασης: Κάρβουνα για καλλιτεχνικές δραστηριότητες; Κιμωλία; Κηρομπογιές; Μαρκαδόροι & υπογραμμιστές; Πολυλειτουργικά όργανα γραφής; Παστέλ; Στυλό & μολύβια
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument > Skriv- och ritinstrument: Ritkol; Kalk; Färgkritor; Märkpennor och överstrykningspennor; Skrivinstrument med flera funktioner; Pastellkritor; Pennor
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe > Przybory piśmiennicze i rysunkowe: Węgiel rysunkowy; Kreda; Kredki; Markery i zakreślacze; Wielofunkcyjne przybory do pisania; Pastele; Pióra, długopisy i ołówki
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri > Yazım ve Çizim Aletleri: Karakalemler; Tebeşir; Boya Kalemleri; Markörler ve Vurgulayıcılar; Çok İşlevli Yazım Aletleri; Pastel Boyalar; Kalemler ve Kurşun Kalemler
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet > Kirjoitus- ja piirustusvälineet: Hiilikynät; Liitu; Väriliidut; Tussit ja korostuskynät; Monikäyttöiset kirjoitusvälineet; Pastelliliidut; Kynät ja lyijykynät
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter > Skrive- og tegneinstrumenter: Kunstkull; Kritt; Fargestifter; Markørpenner og highlightere; Multifunksjonsskriveinstrumenter; Pasteller; Penner og blyanter
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具 > 书写/绘图工具: 绘画炭笔; 粉笔; 蜡笔; 记号笔/荧光笔; 多功能书写工具; 色粉笔/油画棒; 钢笔/铅笔
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório > Instrumentos de escrita e desenho: Carvão vegetal para desenho; Giz; Lápis de cor; Marcadores e sublinhadores; Instrumentos de escrita multifuncionais; Pastéis; Canetas e lápis
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji > Pribor za pisanje i crtanje: Ugljen za crtanje; Kreda; Bojice; Markeri i markeri za podcrtavanje; Višenamjenski pribor za pisanje; Pastele; Penkala i olovke
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou > Instrumente de scris și desen: Cărbune pentru desen; Cretă; Creioane de colorat; Markere și evidențiatoare; Instrumente de scris multifuncționale; Pasteluri; Pixuri și creioane
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng > Dụng cụ vẽ và viết: Than vẽ; Đá phấn; Bút chì màu; Giấy và bút đánh dấu; Bút viết đa năng; Phấn màu; Bút bi và bút chì
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki > Pisalna in risalna orodja: Risarsko oglje; Kreda; Barvice; Flomastri in označevalci besedila; Večfunkcijska pisala; Pasteli; Pisala in svinčniki
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök > Író- és rajzeszközök: Rajzszenek; Kréta; Zsírkréták; Filctollak és kiemelők; Többfunkciós íróeszközök; Pasztellek; Tollak és ceruzák
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品 > 書寫/繪畫用具: 炭筆; 粉筆; 蠟筆; 麥克筆/螢光筆; 多功能筆; 粉彩筆; 筆和鉛筆
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments > Writing & Drawing Instruments: Art Charcoals; Chalk; Crayons; Markers & Highlighters; Multifunction Writing Instruments; Pastels; Pens & Pencils
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์วาดเขียน: ดินสอถ่าน; ชอล์ก; ดินสอสี; ปากกามาร์กเกอร์และปากกาไฮไลต์; อุปกรณ์การเขียนหลายฟังก์ชัน; สีแท่ง; ปากกาและดินสอ
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau > Instruments d’écriture et de dessin: Fusains; Craie; Crayons cire; Marqueurs et surligneurs; Instruments d’écriture multifonctions; Pastels; Stylos et crayons
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber > Skrive- og tegneredskaber: Kulstifter; Kridt; Tegnekridt; Fremhævningspenne og highlightere; Multifunktionelle skriveredskaber; Pasteller; Kuglepenne og blyanter
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje > Písacie a kresliace potreby: Umelecké uhlíky; Krieda; Pastelky; Popisovače a zvýrazňovače; Multifunkčné písacie potreby; Pastely; Perá a ceruzky
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio > Strumenti per scrivere e disegnare: Carboncino; Gessetti; Pastelli colorati; Pennarelli ed evidenziatori; Strumenti di scrittura multifunzione; Pastelli; Penne e matite
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai > Rašymo ir piešimo priemonės: Piešimo anglis; Kreida; Kreidelės; Žymekliai ir paryškinimo rašikliai; Daugiafunkciniai rašymo instrumentai; Pastelė; Rašikliai ir pieštukai